Utah statutes.
32A-15a-202 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Formal objections to renewal.
(1)  The department shall notify governmental entities that in accordance with
this part an objecting governmental entity may file with the commission an
objection to the renewal of a retail licensee's alcoholic beverage license in
the objecting governmental entity's community.
(2)  The department or an objecting governmental entity may file with the
commission a formal objection to any license being renewed by the commission
if the formal objection:
(a)  is filed on the basis of nuisance activity;
(b)  is filed no later than 60 days before the expiration date of the retail
licensee's license; and
(c)  states with particularity all relevant facts and circumstances relating
to the nuisance activity that forms the basis for the formal objection.
